Utah statutes.
59-14-501.   Warning labels required.

(1)  All smokeless tobacco products sold within the state shall be affixed with an adhesive warning label which states: "Use of this product may cause oral cancer and other mouth disorders and is addictive." As used in this part, "smokeless tobacco products" means chewing tobacco and snuff.

(2)  The distributor, wholesaler, or manufacturer of smokeless tobacco products shall provide and pay for warning labels in accordance with specifications adopted by the Department of Health.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 1987 General Session

